Massachusetts, session 194th, HD221.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 54 of the Acts of 1953 is hereby amended by striking in section 2
after the first occurrence of the word "cove" the following:- "within the territorial limits of the
commonwealth" and inserting thereof the following:- "within the sole limits of Cohasset's
authority over its own territorial waters and and not extending to any other municipality’s
territorial waters"
of 1